Illinois, session 104th, SB407.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 526-20 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/26-20 new)7    Sec. 26-20. Chronic Absence Task Force. 8    (a) The Chronic Absence Task Force is created within the 9State Board of Education to study chronic absenteeism and to 10support the development of a State strategy to address the 11ongoing challenges presented by chronic absenteeism for 12students in early childhood education and care programs and 13students in grades kindergarten through 12.14    (b) The Task Force shall consist of the following members:15        (1) the State Superintendent of Education or the State 16    Superintendent's designee;17        (2) the Secretary of Early Childhood or the 18    Secretary's designee;19        (3) the following persons, each appointed by the State 20    Superintendent of Education:21            (A) one expert in children's disabilities, 22        impairments, and social-emotional issues;23            (B) one member who represents a nonprofit   SB0407 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06645 LNS 16681 b1        organization that advocates for students in temporary 2        living situations;3            (C) one member who represents school social 4        workers;5            (D) one member who represents a statewide 6        professional teachers' organization who is a currently 7        employed teacher;8            (E) one member who represents a different 9        statewide professional teachers' organization who is a 10        currently employed teacher;11            (F) one member who represents a professional 12        teachers' organization in a city having a population 13        exceeding 500,000 who is a currently employed teacher;14            (G) one member who represents an association for 15        school administrators;16            (H) one member who represents an association for 17        school board members;18            (I) one member who represents an association for 19        school principals;20            (J) 3 members who represent an association for 21        regional superintendents of schools from different 22        parts of the State;23            (K) one member who represents an association for 24        high school districts;25            (L) one member who represents an association for 26        large unit school districts;  SB0407 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 06645 LNS 16681 b1            (M) one member who represents a school district in 2        a western suburb of the City of Chicago;3            (N) one member who represents a nonprofit 4        organization that advocates for children in foster 5        care;6            (O) one member who represents an organization for 7        charter schools in this State; and8            (P) one member representing an early childhood 9        advocacy organization.10    (c) Task Force members shall serve without compensation.11    (d) The Task Force shall meet initially at the call of the 12State Superintendent of Education. The State Superintendent or 13the State Superintendent's designee shall serve as chairperson 14of the Task Force. For every meeting after the initial 15meeting, the Task Force shall meet at the call of the 16chairperson.17    (e) The State Board of Education shall provide 18administrative support to the Task Force.19    (f) The Task Force may allow testimony from the public 20regarding the chronic absence of students.21    (g) The Task Force shall identify strategies, mechanisms, 22and approaches to help families, educators, principals, 23superintendents, and the State Board of Education address and 24mitigate the high rates of chronic absence of students in 25State-funded early-childhood programs and public-school 26students in grades kindergarten through 12 and shall recommend   SB0407 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 06645 LNS 16681 b1the following to the General Assembly and the State Board of 2Education:3        (1) a coherent State strategy for addressing the high 4    rates of chronic absenteeism in this State;5        (2) State goals for a reduction in chronic 6    absenteeism;7        (3) changes related to State Board of Education 8    policies regarding chronic absences, truancy, and 9    attendance that are consistent with federal law and the 10    State Board of Education's approved plan under the federal 11    Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965;12        (4) State policies or initiatives to be established in 13    order to mitigate and prevent chronic absenteeism; and14        (5) evidence-based practices for using attendance and 15    chronic absenteeism data to create a multitiered system of 16    support that promotes ongoing professional development and 17    equips school-based and community-based personnel with the 18    skills and knowledge necessary to reduce contributing 19    factors to chronic absenteeism in State-funded 20    early-childhood programs and public elementary and 21    secondary schools, which will result in students being 22    ready for college and a career.23    (h) The Task Force shall submit a report to the General 24Assembly and the State Board of Education no later than 25December 15, 2027.26    (i) The Task Force is dissolved and this Section is   SB0407 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 06645 LNS 16681 b1repealed on January 31, 2028. 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect 3September 1, 2025.